bg-BG: Форма на филтър за кафе: Кошница; Конус; Диск; Конусовидни с плоско дъно; Клиновидно; Друго
pl: Kształty filtrów do kawy: Koszykowy; Stożkowe; Dysk; Stożek z płaskim dnem; Klinowy; Pozostałe
ja: コーヒーフィルターの形状: バスケット; 円錐形; ディスク; 平底円錐形; ウェッジ; その他
sv: Kaffefilterform: Korg; Kon; Disk; Koniskt filter med platt botten; Wedge; Övrigt
hu: Kávészűrő formája: Kosár; Tölcsér; Tárcsa; Lapos aljú tölcsér; Ék; Egyéb
zh-TW: 咖啡濾紙形狀: 蛋糕形; 錐形; 碟形; 平底錐形; 梯形; 其他
en: Coffee filter shape: Basket; Cone; Disk; Flat-bottom cone; Wedge; Other
tr: Kahve filtresi şekli: Sepet; Koni; Disk; Düz tabanlı konik; Üçgen; Diğer
lt-LT: Kavos filtro forma: Krepšelis; Gaubtas; Diskinis; Plokščiadugnis kūgis; Pleišto formos; Kita
sl-SI: Oblika filtra za kavo: Košara; Stožec; Disk; Stožec z ravnim dnom; Wedge; Druga
zh-CN: 咖啡滤纸形状: 篮式; 圆锥型; 圆盘型; 平底锥形; 楔形; 其他
sk-SK: Tvar kávového filtra: Košík; Kužeľ; Disk; Kužeľ s plochým dnom; Klin; Iné
de: Kaffeefilterformen: Korb; Kegel; Scheibe; Kegel mit flachem Boden; Wedge; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Oblik filtra za kavu: Košara; Čunj; Disk; Konus s ravnim dnom; Lijevak; Ostalo
nb: Kaffefilter-form: Kurv; Kjegle; Disk; Flatbunnet kjegle; Wedge; Annet
pt-PT: Forma do filtro de café: Cesto; Cone; Disco; Cone de fundo plano; Cunha; Outro
pt-BR: Formato do filtro de café: Cesta; Cone; Discos; Cone de fundo plano; Trapezoidal; Outro
ro-RO: Forma filtrului de cafea: Coș; Con; Disc; Con cu fund plat; Triunghi; Altele
da: Kaffefilterform: Kurv; Kegle; Skive; Fladbundet kegle; Wedge; Andet
es: Forma del filtro de café: Cesta; Cono; Disco; Cono de fondo plano; Cuña; Otros
th: รูปทรงของกระดาษกรองกาแฟ: ตะกร้า; ทรงกรวย; แผ่นกลมแบน; ทรงกรวยก้นแบน; ทรงลิ่ม; อื่นๆ
nl: Koffiefiltervormen: Mand; Kegel; Schijf; Platte-bodem kegel; Wig; Overig
ko: 커피 필터 형태: 바구니; 원뿔; 디스크; 바구니형 원뿔; 웨지; 기타
fr: Forme du filtre à café: Panier; Cône; Disque; Fond plat conique; Wedge; Autre
el: Σχήμα φίλτρου καφέ: Καλάθι; Κώνος; Δίσκος; Κωνικό με επίπεδη βάση; Wedge; Άλλο
vi: Hình dạng bộ lọc cà phê: Rổ; Hình nón; Đĩa; Hình nón đáy phẳng; Hình nêm; Khác
cs: Tvar kávového filtru: Košík; Kužel; Disk; Kužel s plochým dnem; Klín; Jiné
fi: Kahvisuodattimen muoto: Kori; Kartio; Levy; Litteäpohjainen kartio; Kiila; Muu
it: Forme del filtro da caffè: Cestino; Cono; Disco; Cono a fondo piatto; Wedge; Altro
ru: Форма фильтра для кофе: Корзина; Конус; Диск; Конус с плоским дном; Клиновидный; Другой